Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 25. Motor Vehicle Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act

§ 63-25-1.
Short title.

Sections 63-25-1 through 63-25-11 shall be known and may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 63-25-3.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 63-25-1 through 63-25-11, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed to them herein:

“Chop shop” means any building, lot or other premise where one or more persons are or have been knowingly engaged in altering, destroying, disassembling, dismantling, reassembling or knowingly storing any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part known to be illegally obtained by theft, fraud or conspiracy to defraud, in order to either:

Alter, counterfeit, deface, destroy, disguise, falsify, forge, obliterate or remove the identity, including the vehicle identification number of such motor vehicle or motor vehicle part in order to misrepresent the identity of such motor vehicle or motor vehicle part, or to prevent the identification of such motor vehicle or motor vehicle part; or

Sell or dispose of such motor vehicle or motor vehicle part.

“Motor vehicle” includes every device in, upon or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, which is self-propelled or which may be connected to and towed by a self-propelled device, and shall also include any and all other land-based devices which are self-propelled but which are not designed for use upon a highway, including, but not limited to, farm machinery, construction equipment, all-terrain vehicles and off-road vehicles.

“Person” includes a natural person, company, corporation, unincorporated association, partnership, professional corporation and any other legal entity.

“Unidentifiable” means that the uniqueness of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part cannot be established by either expert law enforcement investigative personnel specially trained and experienced in motor vehicle theft investigation procedures and motor vehicle identification examination techniques, or by expert employees of not-for-profit motor vehicle theft prevention agencies specially trained and experienced in motor vehicle theft investigation procedures and motor vehicle identification examination techniques.

“Vehicle identification number” means a number or numbers, a letter or letters, a character or characters, a datum or data, a derivative or derivatives, or a combination or combinations thereof, used by the manufacturer for the purpose of uniquely identifying a motor vehicle or a motor vehicle part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 63-25-5.
Offenses and penalties.

Any person who knowingly and intentionally: (a) owns, operates or conducts a chop shop; (b) transports any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part to or from a location knowing it to be a chop shop; or (c) sells, transfers, purchases or receives any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part either to or from a location knowing it to be a chop shop, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than fifteen (15) years and by a fine of not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).

Any person who knowingly alters, counterfeits, defaces, destroys, disguises, falsifies, forges, obliterates or knowingly removes a vehicle identification number with the intent to misrepresent the identity or prevent the identification of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years and by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

Any person who buys, disposes, sells, transfers or possesses a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part with the knowledge that the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part has been altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated or removed shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years and by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a motor vehicle scrap processor who, in the normal legal course of business and in good faith, processes a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part by crushing, compacting or other similar methods, provided that any vehicle identification number has not been removed from the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part prior to or during any such processing.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any owner or authorized possessor of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part which has been recovered by law enforcement authorities after having been stolen or where the condition of the vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part is known to or has been reported to law enforcement authorities. It shall be presumed that law enforcement authorities have knowledge of all vehicle identification numbers on a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part which are altered, counterfeited, defaced, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated or removed when law enforcement authorities deliver or return the motor vehicle or motor vehicle part to its owner or authorized possessor after it has been recovered by law enforcement authorities after having been reported stolen.

Any person who is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under this section shall be imprisoned for a term up to twice the term authorized for a first offense and shall be fined an amount up to twice the amount authorized for a first offense.

In addition to any other punishment, a person convicted of a violation of this section shall be ordered to make restitution to the lawful owner or owners of the stolen motor vehicle or vehicles or the stolen motor vehicle part or parts, or to the owner’s insurer to the extent that the owner has been compensated by the insurer, and to any other person for any financial loss sustained as a result of a violation of this section.

Financial loss shall include, but not be limited to, loss of earnings, out-of-pocket and other expenses, repair and replacement costs and claims payments. “Lawful owner” shall include an innocent bona fide purchaser for value of a stolen motor vehicle or stolen motor vehicle part who does not know that the motor vehicle or part is stolen; or an insurer to the extent that such insurer has compensated a bona fide purchaser for value.

The court shall determine the extent and method of restitution. In an extraordinary case, the court may determine that the best interests of the victim and justice would not be served by ordering restitution. In any such case, the court shall make and enter specific written findings on the record concerning the extraordinary circumstances presented which militated against restitution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 468, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 495, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 63-25-7.
Seizure of property.

Any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part with vehicle identification numbers or marks which have been altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated or removed may be seized and detained by law enforcement officials for a determination of the true identity of such property. Any such property seized by law enforcement officials, when ownership cannot be determined, shall be contraband and subject to forfeiture.

Any tool, implement or instrumentality used or possessed in connection with any violation of Section 63-25-5, may be seized by a member of a state or local law enforcement agency upon process issued by any court of competent jurisdiction.

Seizure of property described in subsections (1) or (2) of this section may be made by a member of a state or local law enforcement agency without process:

If in accordance with any applicable law or regulation;

If the seizure is incident to inspection under an administrative inspection;

If the seizure is incident to search made under a search warrant;

If the seizure is incident to a lawful arrest;

If the seizure is made pursuant to a valid consent to search;

If the property seized has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal proceeding, or in an injunction or forfeiture proceeding pursuant to Sections 63-25-1 through 63-25-11;

If there are reasonable grounds to believe that the property is directly or indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or

If the property is a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part seized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

When property is seized pursuant to this section, the seizing agency may remove the property to a place selected and designated by the seizing agency.

No civil liability shall be attached to any law enforcement officer acting in good faith in regard to the seizure and forfeiture of motor vehicles, motor vehicle parts, tools, implements or instrumentalities pursuant to Sections 63-25-1 through 63-25-11.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 63-25-9.
Forfeiture of property.

The following items shall be subject to forfeiture unless obtained by theft, fraud or conspiracy to defraud and the rightful owner of the items is known or can be identified and located: (a) any tool, (b) any implement, or (c) any instrumentality, including but not limited to any motor vehicle or motor vehicle part, whether owned or unowned by the person from whose possession or control it was seized, which is used or possessed either in violation of Section 63-25-5 or to promote and facilitate a violation of Section 63-25-5.

Any motor vehicle, other conveyance or motor vehicle part used by any person as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section where the owner or other person in charge of the motor vehicle, other conveyance or motor vehicle part is a consenting party to a violation of Section 63-25-5.

Any motor vehicle, motor vehicle part, other conveyance, tool, implement or instrumentality is not subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or omission which the owner proves to have been committed or omitted without the owner’s knowledge or consent.

Seizing agencies shall utilize their best efforts to identify any seized motor vehicle or motor vehicle part to determine ownership or the identity of any other person having a right or interest in a seized motor vehicle or motor vehicle part. In its reasonable identification and owner location attempts, the seizing agency shall cause the stolen motor vehicle files of the Highway Safety Patrol to be searched for information on motor vehicles similar to the seized motor vehicle or consistent with the seized motor vehicle part.

Where a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part has an apparent value in excess of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), the seizing agency shall:

Consult with an expert specially trained and experienced in motor vehicle theft investigative procedures and motor vehicle identification techniques; and

Request searches of the on-line and off-line files of the National Crime Information Center (NCIC) and the National Automobile Theft Bureau (NATB) when the Highway Safety Patrol’s files have been searched with negative results.

Forfeiture of a motor vehicle, motor vehicle part or other conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party where the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission forming the ground for forfeiture; provided, however, that a forfeiture shall not be subject to the interest of any secured party if the property involved in the forfeiture is a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part seized pursuant to Section 63-25-7(1) and ownership cannot be determined.

Property described in subsection (1) of this section which is seized and held for forfeiture shall not be subject to replevin and is subject only to the order and judgments of a court of competent jurisdiction hearing the forfeiture proceedings.

The seizing agency’s attorney or the district attorney in the county in which the seizure occurs may bring an action for forfeiture in a court of competent jurisdiction. The forfeiture action shall be brought within sixty (60) days from the date of seizure. Except when the ownership of the property involved in the forfeiture is a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part seized pursuant to Section 63-25-7(1) and ownership cannot be determined, the prosecutor, may, in the sound exercise of discretion, decide not to bring a forfeiture action because of the rights of property owners, lienholders or secured creditors, or because of exculpatory, exonerating or mitigating facts and circumstances.

The clerk of court shall give notice of the forfeiture proceeding by mailing a copy of the complaint in the forfeiture proceeding and instructions on how the action for forfeiture may be contested to each person whose right, title or interest is of record in the State Tax Commission or any department or agency of any other state or territory of the United States or of the federal government if such property is required to be registered in any such department or agency.

Notice of the proceeding shall be given to any such other person as may appear, from the facts and circumstances, to have any right, title or interest in or to the property.

The owner of the property, or any person having or claiming right, title or interest in the property, may, within fourteen (14) days after the mailing of such notice, file a verified answer to the complaint and may appear at the hearing on the action for forfeiture.

The prosecutor shall show at a forfeiture hearing by a preponderance of the evidence that such property was used in the commission of a violation of Section 63-25-5, or was used or possessed to facilitate such violation or was seized pursuant to Section 63-25-7(1) and ownership cannot be determined.

The owner of property may show by a preponderance of the evidence that he did not know, and did not have reason to know, that the property was to be used or possessed in the commission of any violation or that any of the exceptions to forfeiture are applicable.

Unless the prosecutor shall make the required showing, the court shall order the property released to the owner. Where the prosecutor has made such a showing, the court may order:

That the property be destroyed by the agency that seized it or by some other agency designated by the court;

That the property be delivered and retained for use by the agency which seized it or some other agency designated by the court; or

That the property may be sold at public auction as provided in subsection (11).

A copy of a forfeiture order shall be filed with the sheriff of the county in which the forfeiture occurs and with each federal or state department or agency with which such property is required to be registered. Such order, when filed, constitutes authority for the issuance, to the agency to whom the property is delivered and retained for use, of a certificate of title, registration certificate or other special certificate as may be required by law considering the condition of the property.

No motor vehicle which has been seized pursuant to Section 63-25-7 or forfeited or sold at public auction pursuant to this section shall be released by the seizing agency, used by an agency designated by the court, or sold at public auction unless any altered, counterfeited, defaced, destroyed, disguised, falsified, forged, obliterated or removed vehicle identification number is corrected by the issuance and affixing of either an assigned or replacement vehicle identification number plate as may be appropriate.

Seizing agencies shall utilize their best efforts to arrange for the towing and storing of motor vehicles and motor vehicle parts in the most economical manner possible. In no event shall the owner of a motor vehicle or a motor vehicle part be required to pay more than the minimum reasonable costs of towing and storage.

Property that has been ordered sold pursuant to subsection (7)(iii) shall be sold at public auction for cash by the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or his designee to the highest and best bidder after advertising the sale for at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last notice to appear not more than ten (10) days nor less than five (5) days prior to the sale, in a newspaper having a general circulation within the jurisdiction of the seizing agency. The legal notice shall contain a description of the property to be sold and a statement of the time and place of sale. The proceeds of the sale shall be disposed of as follows:

To any bona fide lien holder, secured party, or other party holding an interest in the property in the nature of a security interest, to the extent of his interest; and

The balance, if any, remaining after deduction of all storage, court costs and expenses of liquidation shall accrue to the seizing agency.

A seized motor vehicle or motor vehicle part that is neither forfeited nor unidentifiable shall be held subject to the order of the court in which the criminal action is pending or, if a request for its release from such custody is made, until the district attorney has notified the defendant or the defendant’s attorney of such request and both the prosecution and defense have been afforded a reasonable opportunity for an examination of the property to determine its true value and to produce or reproduce, by photographs or other identifying techniques, legally sufficient evidence for introduction at trial or other criminal proceedings. Upon expiration of a reasonable time for the completion of the examination, which in no event shall exceed fourteen (14) days from the date of service upon the defense of the notice of request for return of property as provided herein, the property shall be released to the person making such request after satisfactory proof such person is entitled to the possession thereof. Notwithstanding the foregoing, upon application by either party with notice to the other, the court may order retention of the property if it determines that retention is necessary in the furtherance of justice.

When a seized motor vehicle is forfeited, restored to its owner or otherwise disposed of, the seizing agency shall retain a report of the transaction for a period of at least one (1) year from the date of the transaction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 495, § 1, eff from and after Jan 1, 1994.

§ 63-25-11.
Civil proceedings against offenders.

Any district attorney or any aggrieved person may institute civil proceedings against any person in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking relief from conduct constituting a violation of subsections (1) and (2) of Section 63-25-5. If the plaintiff in such a proceeding proves the alleged violation or its threat, by a preponderance of the evidence, any court of competent jurisdiction after due provision for the rights of innocent persons may grant relief by entering any appropriate order or judgment including but not limited to:

Ordering any defendant to be divested of any interest in any property;

Imposing reasonable restrictions upon the future activities or investments of any defendant, including prohibiting any defendant from engaging in the same type of endeavor as the defendant was engaged in previously;

Ordering the suspension or revocation of a license, permit or prior approval granted by any public agency or any other public authority; or

Ordering the surrender of the charter of a corporation organized under the laws of this state or the revocation of a certificate authorizing a foreign corporation to conduct business within the state upon finding that the board of directors or a managerial agent acting on behalf of the corporation, in conducting the affairs of the corporation, has authorized or engaged in conduct made unlawful by Sections 63-25-1 through 63-25-11 and that, for the prevention of future criminal conduct, the public interest requires the charter of the corporation be surrendered and the corporation dissolved or the certificate revoked.

In a proceeding under this section, injunctive relief shall be granted in conformity with the principles that govern the granting of relief from injury or threatened injury in other cases, but no showing of special or irreparable injury shall be required to be made. Pending final determination of a proceeding under this section, a temporary restraining order or a preliminary injunction may be issued upon a showing of immediate danger of significant injury, including the possibility that any judgment for money damages might be difficult to execute, and, in a proceeding initiated by an aggrieved person, upon the execution of proper bond against injury for an injunction improvidently granted.

Any person injured, directly or indirectly, by conduct constituting a violation by any person of Section 63-25-5 shall, in addition to any other relief, have a cause of action for threefold the actual damages sustained by the person.

A final judgment or decree rendered against the defendant in any civil or criminal proceeding shall estop the defendant in any subsequent civil action or proceeding brought by any person as to all matters as to which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel as between the parties to the civil or criminal proceeding.

Personal service of any process in an action under this section may be made upon any person outside the state if the person has engaged in any conduct constituting a violation of Section 63-25-5 in this state. The person shall be deemed to have thereby submitted to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state for the purposes of this provision.

Obtaining any civil remedy under this section shall not preclude obtaining any other civil or criminal remedy under either this chapter or any other provision of law. Civil remedies under this section are supplemental and not mutually exclusive.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 469, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 63-25-13.
Scrap processors to maintain records identifying owners and vehicle identification numbers; law enforcement agencies authorized to inspect records and vehicles; penalties.

Repealed by Laws, 2011, ch. 451, § 4, effective July 1, 2011.

§63-25-13. [Laws, 2000, ch. 495, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.]